Utah statutes.
53A-15-1207.   State Board of Education to deduct funds and make payments -- Plan for the payment of online courses taken by private and home school students.

(1) (a)  The State Board of Education shall deduct money from funds allocated to the student's primary LEA of enrollment under Chapter 17a, Minimum School Program Act, to pay for online course fees.

(b)  Money shall be deducted under Subsection (1) in the amount and at the time an online course provider qualifies to receive payment for an online course as provided in Subsection 53A-15-1206(4).

(2)  From money deducted under Subsection (1), the State Board of Education shall make payments to the student's online course provider as provided in Section 53A-15-1206.

(3)  The Legislature shall establish a plan, which shall take effect beginning on July 1, 2013, for the payment of online courses taken by a private school or home school student.

